sk-SK: Hry zahrnuté v cene: Vzdušný hokej; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Karty; Dáma; Šach; Čínska dáma; Šípky; Domino; Stolný futbal; Ludo; Manji; Guličky; Nok hokej; Pick-up palice; Pokrové kocky; Shuffleboard; Hady a rebríky; Steeplechase; Stolný tenis; Piškvorky; Vlakový šach; Iné
ja: 含まれるゲーム: エアホッケー; バックギャモン; ビリヤード; ブラックジャック; ボウリング; カード; チェッカー; チェス; チャイニーズチェッカー; ダーツ; ドミノ; フーズボール; ルード; 卍; ビー玉; ノックホッケー; ピックアップスティック; ポーカーダイス; シャッフルボード; スネーク&ラダー; 障害物競走; 卓球; ○xゲーム; トレインチェス; その他
pt-BR: Jogos incluídos: Hóquei de ar; Gamão; Billiard; Blackjack; Boliche; Cartões; Damas; Xadrez; Damas chinesas; Dardos; Dominó; Pebolim; Ludo; Manji; Bolas de gude; Nok hockey; Pega varetas; Dados de poker; Shuffleboard; Cobras e escadas; Steeplechase; Tênis de mesa; Jogo da velha; Train Chess; Outro
ru: Игры в комплекте: Аэрохоккей; Нарды; Бильярд; Блэк-джек; Боулинг; Карты; Шашки; Шахматы; Китайские шашки; Дартс; Домино; Настольный футбол; Лудо; Манджи; Шарики; Нок-хоккей; Бирюльки; Покерные кости; Шаффлборд; Змеи и лестницы; Бег с препятствиями; Настольный теннис; Крестики-нолики; Шахматы-поезда; Другой
sv: Spel ingår: Lufthockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Kort; Dam; Schack; Kinaschack; Dart; Domino; Bordsfotboll; Ludo; Manji; Spelkulor; Nok hockey; Plockepinn; Pokertärning; Shuffleboard; Ormar och stegar; Hinderlöpning; Bordtennis; Luffarschack; Tågschack; Annat
nb: Inkluderte spill: Lufthockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Kort; Dam; Sjakk; Kinasjakk; Dart; Domino; Foosball; Ludo; Manji; Klinkekuler; Nok-hockey; Pick-up sticks; Pokerterninger; Shuffleboard; Stigespill; Steeplechase; Bordtennis; Tripp-trapp-tresko; Trene sjakk; Annen
ro-RO: Jocuri incluse: Air hockey; Table; Biliard; Blackjack; Bowling; Cărți; Dame; Șah; Dame chinezești; Darts; Domino; Foosball; Ludo; Manji; Joc cu bile; Nok hockey; Bețițoare; Zaruri de poker; Shuffleboard; Snakes & ladders; Curse de cai cu obstacole; Tenis de masă; X și 0; Învață șah; Altele
da: Spil inkluderet: Airhockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Kort; Dam; Skak; Kinesisk dam; Dartpile; Domino; Bordfodbold; Ludo; Manji; Marmorkugler; Nok-hockey; Mikado; Pokerterninger; Shuffleboard; Slanger og stiger; Steeplechase; Bordtennis; Kryds og bolle; Togskak; Andet
hu: A tartalmazott játékok: Léghoki; Backgammon; Biliárd; Blackjack; Bowling; Kártya; Dámajáték; Sakk; Kínai dámajáték; Darts; Dominó; Csocsó; Ludo; Manji; Marbles; Nok hoki; Felszedőbotok; Pókerkocka; Shuffleboard; Kígyók és létrák; Akadályverseny; Asztalitenisz; Tic-tac-toe; Utazósakk; Egyéb
fi: Mukana tulevat pelit: Ilmakiekko; Backgammon; Biljardipallo; Blackjack; Keilailu; Kortit; Tammi; Shakki; Kiinalainen tammi; Darts; Domino; Pöytäfutis; Ludo; Manji; Marmorikuulat; Nok hockey; Mikado; Pokerinopat; Shuffleboard; Käärmeet ja tikkaat; Estejuoksu; Pöytätennis; Ristinolla; Shakkiharjoittelu; Muu
tr: Dahil Olan Oyunlar: Hava hokeyi; Tavla; Bilardo; Blackjack; Bowling; Kartlar; Dama; Satranç; Çin daması; Dartlar; Domino; Langırt; Kızma Birader; Manji; Bilyeler; Hava hokeyi; Çubukları topla; Poker zarları; Disk iteleme oyunu; Yılanlar ve merdivenler; Engelli koşu; Masa tenisi; Üç taş; Tren satrancı; Diğer
ko: 포함된 게임: 에어 하키; 백개먼; 당구; 블랙잭; 볼링; 카드; 체커; 체스; 차이니스 체커; 다트; 도미노; 푸스볼; 루도; 만지; 구슬; 노크 하키; 나무 블럭 빼기; 포커 주사위; 셔플보드; 뱀과 사다리; 장애물 경주; 탁구; 틱택토; 트레인 체스; 기타
en: Games included: Air hockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Cards; Checkers; Chess; Chinese checkers; Darts; Dominoes; Foosball; Ludo; Manji; Marbles; Nok hockey; Pick-up sticks; Poker dice; Shuffleboard; Snakes & ladders; Steeplechase; Table tennis; Tic-tac-toe; Train chess; Other
zh-TW: 含有遊戲: 空氣曲棍球; 西洋雙陸棋; 撞球; 二十一點; 保齡球; 卡片; 西洋跳棋; 西洋棋; 中國跳棋; 飛鏢用鏢; 骨牌; 手足球; 英國十字戲; 萬字; 彈珠; 諾克曲棍球; 挑木棒; 撲克骰; 沙狐球; 蛇梯棋; 越野競速; 乒乓球; 圈圈叉叉; 益智棋類動力火車; 其他
sl-SI: Vključene igre: Zračni hokej; Backgammon; Biljard; Blackjack; Kegljanje; Karte; Dama; Šah; Kitajska dama; Pikado; Domine; Namizni nogomet; Človek ne jezi se; Manji; Frnikule; Nok hokej; Pobiralne palice; Poker kocke; Shuffleboard; Kače in lestve; Tek z zaprekami; Namizni tenis; Križci in krožci; Šahovski vlak; Drugo
it: Giochi inclusi: Air hockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Carte; Dama; Scacchi; Dama cinese; Freccette; Domino; Biliardino; Ludo; Manji; Biglie; Nok hockey; Mikado; Dadi da poker; Shuffleboard; Scale e serpenti; Corsa a ostacoli; Ping pong; Tris; Allenamento scacchi; Altro
pl: Gry w zestawie: Hokej powietrzny; Tryktrak; Bilard; Blackjack; Kręgle; Karty; Gra Checkers; Szachy; Chińskie warcaby; Rzutki; Domino; Piłkarzyki; Ludo; Manji; Kulki; Hokej Nok; Bierki; Pokerowe kości; Shuffleboard; Snakes & ladders; Wyścigi konne z przeszkodami; Tenis stołowy; Kółko i krzyżyk; Szachy treningowe; Pozostałe
vi: Các trò chơi đi kèm: Khúc côn cầu trên không; Cờ tào cáo; Bi-a; Blackjack; Bowling; Thẻ, bài; Cờ đam; Cờ vua; Cờ đam Trung Quốc; Phi tiêu; Domino; Bi lắc; Cờ cá ngựa; Manji; Bi ve; Khúc côn cầu trên bảng; Nhặt que; Xúc xắc poker; Đẩy đĩa; Rắn và thang; Vượt chướng ngại vật; Bóng bàn; Cờ ca-rô; Cờ tàu hỏa; Khác
zh-CN: 包含游戏: 空气曲棍球; 双陆棋; 台球; 二十一点; 保龄球用品; 卡片; 西洋跳棋; 西洋棋; 中国跳棋; 镖; 骨牌; 桌上足球; 英国十字戏; 卍字棋; 弹珠; 诺克曲棍球; 挑棍; 扑克骰子; 沙狐球; 蛇梯棋; 障碍赛; 乒乓球; 井字游戏; 火车棋; 其他
fr: Jeux inclus: Air Hockey; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Cartes; Dames; Échecs; Dames chinoises; Fléchettes; Dominos; Baby-foot; Ludo; Manji; Billes; Nok Hockey; Mikado; Dé de poker; Jeu de palets; Serpents et échelles; Steeple; Tennis de table; Morpion; Train Chess; Autre
de: Enthaltene Spiele: Airhockey; Backgammon; Billard; Blackjack; Bowling; Karten; Dame; Schach; Chinesische Dame; Darts; Domino; Tischfußball; Ludo; Manji; Murmeln; Nok-Hockey; Mikadospiel; Pokerwürfel; Shuffleboard; Leiterspiel; Hindernislauf; Tischtennis; Tic-Tac-Toe; Schach trainieren; Sonstiges
el: Περιλαμβάνονται παιχνίδια: Επιτραπέζιο χόκεϊ; Τάβλι; Μπιλιάρδο; Μπλακτζάκ; Μπόουλινγκ; Κάρτες; Ντάμα; Σκάκι; Κινεζική ντάμα; Βελάκια; Ντόμινο; Ποδοσφαιράκι; Ludo; Manji; Μάρμαρα; Nok hockey; Μικάντο; Ζάρια πόκερ; Shuffleboard; Φίδια και σκάλες; Κούρσες ιπποδρόμου; Πινγκ πονγκ; Tic-tac-toe; Εκμάθηση σκακιού; Άλλο
th: รวมเกม: แอร์ฮอกกี้; แบ็กแกมมอน; ทรงบิลเลียด; แบล็กแจ็ก; โบว์ลิ่ง; การ์ด; หมากฮอส; หมากรุก; หมากฮอสจีน; ลูกดอก; โดมิโน; ฟุสบอล; ลูโด; มันจิ; ลูกแก้ว; นคฮอกกี้; แท่งไม้; ลูกเต๋าโปกเกอร์; ชัฟเฟิลบอร์ด; บันไดงู; สตีเพิลเชส; ปิงปอง; โอเอกซ์; หมากรถไฟ; อื่นๆ
es: Juegos incluidos: Hockey de aire; Backgammon; Billar; Blackjack; Bolos; Cartas; Damas; Ajedrez; Damas chinas; Dardos; Dominó; Futbolín; Ludo; Manji; Canicas; Nok hockey; Palitos chinos; Dados de póquer; Tejos; Serpientes y escaleras; Steeplechase; Tenis de mesa; Tres en línea; Train chess; Otros
bg-BG: Включени игри: Въздушен хокей; Табла; Билярд; Блекджек; Боулинг; Карти; Дама; Шахмат; Китайски шах; Дартс; Домино; Футбол; Лудо; Манджи; Топчета; Нок хокей; Пръчици за вдигане; Зарове за покер; Шафълборд; Змии и стълби; Стипълчейз; Тенис на маса; Tic-tac-toe; Тренирайте шах; Други
lt-LT: Įtraukti žaidimai: Oro ritulys; Nardai; Biliardas; Dvidešimt vienas; Boulingas; Kortos; Šaškės; Šachmatai; Kiniškos šaškės; Smiginis; Domino; Stalo futbolas; Ludo; Manji; Marmuriniai rutuliukai; Stalo ritulys; Lazdelės; Pokerio kauliukas; Slydinys; „Snakes & ladders“; Kliūtinis bėgimas; Stalo tenisas; Kryžiukai-nuliukai; Mokomieji šachmatai; Kita
cs: Zahrnuté hry: Stolní hokej; Backgammon; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Karty; Dáma; Šachy; Čínská dáma; Jednotlivé šipky a sady šipek; Domino; Stolní fotbal; Ludo; Manji; Kuličky; Nok hokej; Mikádo; Pokerové kostky; Shuffleboard; Hadi a žebříky; Dostihy; Stolní tenis; Piškvorky; Vlakové šachy; Jiné
nl: Inbegrepen spellen: Airhockey; Backgammon; Biljart; Blackjack; Bowling; Kaarten; Dammen; Schaken; Chinees dammen; Darten; Domino; Tafelvoetbal; Mens-erger-je-niet; Manji; Knikkeren; Tafelhockey; Mikado; Pokerdobbelstenen; Sjoelen; Slangen en ladders; Paardenrace; Tafeltennis; Boter-kaas-en-eieren; Treinschaken; Andere
pt-PT: Jogos incluídos: Hóquei de ar; Gamão; Billiard; Blackjack; Bowling; Cartões; Jogo de damas; Xadrez; Damas chinesas; Dardos; Dominó; Matraquilhos; Ludo; Manji; Berlindes; Nok hockey; Mikado; Dados de póquer; Shuffleboard; Snakes & ladders; Steeplechase; Ténis de mesa; Jogo do galo; Xadrez para praticar; Outro
hr-HR: Uključene igre: Stolni hokej; Backgammon; Biljar; Blackjack; Kuglanje; Karte; Dama; Šah; Kineska dama; Pikado; Domino; Stolni nogomet; Ludo; Manji; Pikule; Hokej na ploči; Mikado; Poker kocke; Shuffleboard; Zmije i ljestve; Trčanje s preponama; Stolni tenis; Križić-kružić; Učenje šaha; Ostalo